Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
CHAPTER 10 Simultaneous Death

Editor’s notes.

This chapter was effective January 1, 1998, to the extent that no vested rights of title, year’s support, succession, or inheritance are impaired, as provided by the version of Code Section 53-1-1 enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10, effective January 1, 1998, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this chapter, and enacted the current chapter.
The former chapter consisted of §§

53-10-1

through

53-10-4

, and was based on Ga. L. 1945, p. 167, §§ 1-7; Ga. L. 1958, p. 355, §§ 1-7; Ga. L. 1959, p. 111, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 937, § 6.

53-10-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Simultaneous Death Act in Georgia.”

History.

Code 1981, §

53-10-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For comment, “The Common Disaster: The Fifth Circuits Error in Estate of Carter v. United States and the Glitch in the ‘Tax on Prior Transfer’ Credit in Valuing Life Estates Created in a Common Disaster,” see 40 Emory L.J. 1269 (1991).

53-10-2.
Disposition of property upon simultaneous deaths where devolution depends on priority of death.

When the title to property or the devolution of property depends upon priority of death and there is no sufficient evidence that the individuals have died other than simultaneously, the property of each individual shall be disposed of as if that individual had survived, except as provided otherwise in this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-10-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-10-3.
Disposition of property upon simultaneous death of beneficiary and another individual where interest depends on survival.

If property is so disposed of that the right of a beneficiary to succeed to any interest in such property is conditional upon surviving another individual and both individuals die and there is no sufficient evidence that the two have died other than simultaneously, the beneficiary shall be deemed not to have survived. If there is no sufficient evidence that two or more beneficiaries have died otherwise than simultaneously and property has been disposed of in such a way that at the time of their deaths each beneficiary would have been entitled to the property if that beneficiary had survived the others, the property shall be divided into as many equal portions as there were such beneficiaries and these portions shall be distributed respectively to those who would have taken in the event that each such beneficiary survived.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-10-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-10-4.
Disposition of property upon simultaneous death of joint owners.

If any stocks, bonds, bank deposits, or other intangible property shall be owned so that one of two joint owners is entitled to the whole on the death of the other and both owners die and there is no sufficient evidence that the two joint owners have died otherwise than simultaneously, these assets shall be distributed one-half as if one joint owner had survived and one-half as if the other joint owner had survived. If there are more than two joint owners and there is no sufficient evidence that all have died other than simultaneously, these assets shall be divided into as many equal shares as there are joint owners and these portions shall be distributed respectively to those who would have taken in the event that each joint owner had survived.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-10-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-10-5.
Applicability of chapter.

This chapter shall not apply in the case of wills, trusts, deeds, contracts of insurance, or any other situation where provision is made for distribution of property different from that provided in this chapter or where provision is made for a presumption as to survivorship that results in a distribution of property different from that provided in this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-10-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-61/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “that results” for “which results” in this Code section.

53-10-6.
Uniformity of law.

This chapter shall be so construed and interpreted as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law in those states which enact it.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-10-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.